Utah statutes.
16-6a-205.   Organization of the corporation.

(1)  After incorporation:

(a)  if initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors may hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the initial directors, to complete the organization of the nonprofit corporation by:

(i)  appointing officers;

(ii)  adopting bylaws, if desired; and

(iii)  carrying on any other business brought before the meeting; or

(b)  if initial directors are not named in the articles of incorporation, until directors are elected, the incorporators may hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators to do whatever is necessary and proper to complete the organization of the nonprofit corporation, including:

(i)  the election of directors and officers;

(ii)  the appointment of members; and

(iii)  the adoption and amendment of bylaws.

(2)  Action required or permitted by this chapter to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced by one or more written consents that:

(a)  describe the action taken; and

(b)  are signed by each incorporator.

(3)  An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.



Enacted by Chapter 300, 2000 General Session

